District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.01

General.

Every individual shall have an equal opportunity to participate fully in the economic, cultural and intellectual life of the District and to have an equal opportunity to participate in all aspects of life, including, but not limited to, in employment, in places of public accommodation, resort or amusement, in educational institutions, in public service, and in housing and commercial space accommodations.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 201, 24 DCR 6038

History

Public accommodations licensed by District, prohibition against discrimination, see § 47-2901 et seq.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 2-1403.01.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-2511.
1973 Ed., § 6-2211.

Prior Codifications

Establishment of Department of Human Rights and Minority Business Development: See Mayor’s Order 89-247, November 1, 1989.

Mayor's Orders